Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 4. Community Dispute Resolution Centers.

Sec. 47.12.450.
Community dispute resolution centers for matters involving minors.

An entity organized for the purpose of providing community mediation services may establish and operate a community dispute resolution center to resolve disputes between minors who are alleged to have committed offenses and the victims of those offenses.

The commissioner may recognize an entity organized for the purpose of providing community mediation services as a community dispute resolution center to serve as a center to resolve disputes between minors and victims. Before extending recognition under this subsection, the commissioner shall determine that the bylaws of the entity set out standards and procedures

for filing requests for dispute resolution services with the center and for scheduling mediation sessions participated in by the parties to the dispute;

to ensure that each dispute mediated meets the criteria for appropriateness for mediation and for rejecting disputes that do not meet the criteria;

for giving notice of time, place, and nature of the mediation session to the parties, and for conducting mediation sessions that comply with the provisions of this section;

to ensure that participation by all parties is voluntary;

for obtaining referrals from public and private bodies;

for providing mediators who, during the dispute resolution process, may not make decisions or determinations of the issues involved, but who shall facilitate negotiations by the participants themselves to achieve a voluntary resolution of the issues;

for communicating to the agency making a referral under AS

47.12.040(a)(1)(A)

or the court making a referral under AS

47.12.120(b)(4)(A)

, as appropriate, the following:

notice that the minor and victim have been unable to enter into a written agreement under (d)(2) of this section or that the minor or victim has withdrawn from mediation as authorized by (f) of this section;

notice that the minor and victim have entered into a written agreement under (d)(2) of this section; the center shall transmit a copy of the agreement to the agency or the court, as appropriate;

notice that the minor has failed to perform fully the minor’s obligations under the written agreement under (d)(2) of this section;

notice that the minor has successfully completed all that is required of the minor under the provisions of the written agreement under (d)(2) of this section; and

for informing and educating the community about the community dispute resolution center and encouraging the use of the center’s services in appropriate cases.

A center established under this section shall provide dispute resolution services between a minor who has committed an offense and who, because of the commission of the offense, may be alleged to be a delinquent minor under AS

47.12.020

, and a person who was a victim of that offense. The center shall provide dispute resolution services either without charge to a participant or for a fee that is based on the participant’s ability to pay.

In conducting a dispute resolution process under this section, a center shall require that

the minor and the victim enter into a written agreement that expresses the method by which they shall attempt to resolve the issues in dispute; and

at the conclusion of the dispute resolution process, the minor and the victim enter into a written agreement that sets out the settlement of the issues and the future responsibilities, if any, of each party.

Except for a notice or a communication described in (b)(7) of this section, all memoranda, work notes or products, or case files of centers established under this section are confidential and privileged and are not subject to disclosure in any judicial or administrative proceeding unless the court or administrative tribunal determines that the materials were submitted by a participant to the center for the purpose of avoiding discovery of the material in a subsequent proceeding. Any communication relating to the subject matter of the resolution made during the resolution process by a participant, mediator, or another person is a privileged communication and is not subject to disclosure in a judicial or administrative proceeding unless all parties to the communication waive the privilege. However, privilege and limitation on evidentiary use set out in this subsection do not apply to a communication of a threat that injury or damage may be inflicted on a person or on the property of a party to the dispute to the extent the communication may be relevant evidence in a criminal matter.

A minor or a victim who enters a dispute resolution process at a center established under this section may revoke consent, withdraw from dispute resolution, and seek judicial or administrative redress before reaching a written resolution agreement. The withdrawal must be in writing. If a minor or a victim withdraws from dispute resolution, a legal penalty, sanction, or restraint may not be imposed upon the person for that withdrawal.

A center established under this section may seek and accept contributions and any other available money and may expend the money to carry out the purposes of this section.

An individual who is a member or an agent of the board of directors of or a mediator at a community dispute resolution center is immune from suit in a civil action based upon the exercise or performance of or the failure to exercise or perform a discretionary function or a discretionary duty within the official capacity of the individual. A community dispute resolution center is immune from suit in a civil action based upon an act or failure to act for which an individual is granted immunity under this subsection.

In this section, “center” means a community dispute resolution center.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1998)